Utah statutes.
58-56-19.   Standardized building permit numbering.
(1)  As used in this section, "project" means a "construction project" as
defined in Section 38-1-27.
(2)  The division shall develop a standardized building permit numbering
system for use by any compliance agency in the state that issues a permit for
construction.
(3) (a)  Beginning on July 1, 2009, a compliance agency issuing a permit for
construction shall use the standardized building permit numbering system
described under Subsection (2).
(b)  A compliance agency may not use a numbering system other than the system
described under Subsection (2) to define a building permit number.
(4)  The standardized building permit numbering system described under
Subsection (2) shall include a combination of alpha or numeric characters
arranged in a format acceptable to the compliance agency.
